Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.093

Suspension of marketing order upon request of commodity commission.

The director may, upon the request of a commodity commission and without compliance with RCW 15.66.070 through 15.66.090, suspend the commission's order or term or provision thereof for a period of not to exceed one year, if the director finds that the suspension will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter. Any suspension of all, or substantially all, of a marketing order by the director is not effective until the end of the then current marketing season.

[ 2002 c 313 s 48.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.